Massachusetts, session 194th, H1287.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 32A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2006 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following section:
Section 17J. Notwithstanding any general or special law or rule or regulation to the
contrary, a health insurance policy that covers infantile cataract surgery must provide coverage
for aphakic lenses for treatment and rehabilitation. The coverage must include benefits for
prosthetic contact lenses or glasses, as required as medically necessary by the physician.
SECTION 2. Chapter 118E, is hereby amended by adding the following section:
Section 61. Notwithstanding any general or special law or rule or regulation to the
contrary, a health insurance policy that covers infantile cataract surgery must provide coverage
of 3

for aphakic lenses for treatment and rehabilitation. The coverage must include benefits for
prosthetic contact lenses or glasses, as required as medically necessary by the physician.
SECTION 3. Section 108 of Chapter 175 is hereby amended by adding the following
section:
Section K. Notwithstanding any general or special law or rule or regulation to the
contrary, a health insurance policy that covers infantile cataract surgery must provide coverage
for aphakic lenses for treatment and rehabilitation. The coverage must include benefits for
prosthetic contact lenses or glasses, as required as medically necessary by the physician.
SECTION 4. Section 110 of Chapter 175 is hereby amended by adding the following
section:
Section N. Notwithstanding any general or special law or rule or regulation to the
contrary, a health insurance policy that covers infantile cataract surgery must provide coverage
for aphakic lenses for treatment and rehabilitation. The coverage must include benefits for
prosthetic contact lenses or glasses, as required as medically necessary by the physician.
SECTION 5. Chapter 176A of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the
following section:
Section 8CC. Notwithstanding any general or special law or rule or regulation to the
contrary, a health insurance policy that covers infantile cataract surgery must provide coverage
for aphakic lenses for treatment and rehabilitation. The coverage must include benefits for
prosthetic contact lenses or glasses, as required as medically necessary by the physician.
of 3

SECTION 6. Chapter 176B of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the
following section:
Section 4CC. Notwithstanding any general or special law or rule or regulation to the
contrary, a health insurance policy that covers infantile cataract surgery must provide coverage
for aphakic lenses for treatment and rehabilitation. The coverage must include benefits for
prosthetic contact lenses or glasses, as required as medically necessary by the physician.
SECTION 7. Chapter 176G of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the
following section:
Section 4U. Notwithstanding any general or special law or rule or regulation to the
contrary, a health insurance policy that covers infantile cataract surgery must provide coverage
for aphakic lenses for treatment and rehabilitation. The coverage must include benefits for
prosthetic contact lenses or glasses, as required as medically necessary by the physician.
SECTION 8. Chapter 176I of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the
following section:
Section 12. Notwithstanding any general or special law or rule or regulation to the
contrary, a health insurance policy that covers infantile cataract surgery must provide coverage
for aphakic lenses for treatment and rehabilitation. The coverage must include benefits for
prosthetic contact lenses or glasses, as required as medically necessary by the physician.
of 3